pl: Ocena Sold Secure: Brązowy; Diamentowy; Złoty; Brak oceny; Srebrny; Inny
tr: Sold Secure derecelendirmesi: Bronz; Elmas; Altın; Derecelendirilmemiş; Gümüş; Diğer
lt-LT: „Sold Secure“ įvertinimas: Bronzinis; Deimantinis; Auksinis; Neįvertintas; Sidabrinis; Kita
fr: Classement Sold Secure: Bronze; Diamant; Or; Non classé; Argent; Autre
cs: Hodnocení Sold Secure: Bronzová; Diamantová; Zlatá; Nehodnoceno; Stříbrná; Jiné
sk-SK: Hodnotenie Sold Secure: Bronzové; Diamantové; Zlaté; Nehodnotené; Strieborné; Iné
bg-BG: Рейтинг Sold Secure: Бронз; Диамант; Злато; Без рейтинг; Сребро; Друго
hr-HR: Ocjena Sold Secure: Bronca; Dijamant; Zlato; Bez ocjene; Srebro; Ostalo
ja: Sold Secure評価: ブロンズ; ダイヤモンド; ゴールド; 評価なし; シルバー; その他
zh-TW: Sold Secure 評級: 銅級; 鑽石級; 金級; 無評級; 銀級; 其他
ro-RO: Calificativ Sold Secure: Bronz; Diamant; Aur; Neevaluat; Argint; Altele
fi: Sold Secure -luokitus: Pronssi; Timantti; Kulta; Ei luokiteltu; Hopea; Muu
en: Sold Secure rating: Bronze; Diamond; Gold; Not rated; Silver; Other
hu: Sold Secure minősítés: Bronz; Gyémánt; Arany; Nem értékelt; Ezüst; Egyéb
pt-PT: Classificação Sold Secure: Bronze; Diamante; Ouro; Sem classificação; Prata; Outra
el: Αξιολόγηση Sold Secure: Χάλκινη; Διαμαντένια; Χρυσή; Χωρίς αξιολόγηση; Ασημένια; Άλλο
sv: Sold Secure-klassning: Brons; Diamant; Guld; Ej klassificerad; Silver; Övrigt
zh-CN: Sold Secure 安全评级: 铜级; 钻石级; 金级; 无评级; 银级; 其他
vi: Đã bán Xếp hạng an toàn: Đồng; Kim cương; Vàng; Không được xếp hạng; Bạc; Khác
sl-SI: Ocena Sold Secure: Bron; Diamant; Zlato; Brez ocene; Srebro; Drugo
nl: Sold Secure beoordeling: Brons; Diamant; Goud; Geen beoordeling; Zilver; Anders
ko: Sold Secure 등급: 브론즈; 다이아몬드; 골드; 등급 없음; 실버; 기타
ru: Рейтинг Sold Secure: Бронза; Бриллиант; Золото; Без рейтинга; Серебро; Другое
pt-BR: Sold Secure classificação: Bronze; Diamante; Ouro; Não classificado; Prata; Outra
es: Calificación Sold Secure: Bronce; Diamante; Oro; Sin clasificación; Plata; Otro
da: Sold Secure-vurdering: Bronze; Diamant; Guld; Ikke bedømt; Sølv; Andet
nb: Sold Secure-vurdering: Bronse; Diamant; Gull; Ikke vurdert; Sølv; Annet
it: Classificazione Sold Secure: Bronzo; Diamante; Oro; Non classificato; Argento; Altro
de: Sold-Secure-Bewertung: Bronze; Diamant; Gold; Nicht bewertet; Silber; Andere
th: เรตติ้ง Sold Secure: บรอนซ์; ไดมอนด์; โกลด์; ไม่ได้รับการจัดอันดับ; ซิลเวอร์; อื่นๆ